Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1248.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1103(g) of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1103. Restricted activities.* * *(g) Former official or employee.--(1) No former public official or public employee shall represent a person, with promised or actual compensation, on any matter before the governmental body with which he has been associated for one year after he leaves that body.(2) A former member of the General Assembly who represents a person, with promised or actual compensation, in any matter before the General Assembly may not receive 1234567891011121314151617181920 pension benefits administered by the State Employees' Retirement System or health benefits administered by the Commonwealth during the calendar year when the former member assists or acts in a representative capacity before the General Assembly. This paragraph shall only apply to former members of the General Assembly first elected after the effective date of this paragraph.* * *Section 2. Title 71 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5711. Payment of benefits from the system to former members of General Assembly.A former member of the General Assembly who represents a person, with promised or actual compensation, in any matter before the General Assembly may not receive benefits from the system during the calendar year when the former member assists or acts in a representative capacity before the General Assembly. This section shall only apply to former members of the General Assembly first elected after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1248PN1385 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920